South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S340.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-3910. (A) It is unlawful for a person to smoke a tobacco product in a motor vehicle while a person who is less than twelve years old is a passenger. (B) As contained in this section, "tobacco product" means a product that contains tobacco and is intended for human consumption. (C) A person who violates this section must be fined not more than one hundred dollars for each violation. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----